South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S594.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Social Services, relating to Regulations for the Licensing of Child Care Centers, designated as Regulation Document Number 5314, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The Department of Social Services is proposing to amend South Carolina Code of Regulations 114-500 to 114-509 to establish and maintain standards for licensed child care centers that are reasonably aligned with recommended standards of national organizations and which further the Department's mission to establish and maintain standards that protect the health, safety, and well-being of children receiving care in licensed child care centers. The Department of Social Services is responsible for establishing and promulgating rules and regulations for the proper operation of licensed child care centers and for the care and protection of children who receive care in licensed child care centers. The Department of Social Services is proposing regulations that set forth the requirements for licensed child care centers. The proposed regulations are designed to promote the health, safety, and welfare of the children who are to be served by assuring safe and adequate physical surroundings and healthful food and by assuring supervision and care of the children by a sufficient number of capable, qualified personnel. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on April 26, 2024. ----XX----